North Carolina, session 2025, HB511.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Administrative Office of the Courts the sum of eleven million five hundred thousand dollars
($11,500,000) in recurring funds in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated
for magistrate salary increases authorized by this act.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-171.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-171.1. Duty hours, salary, and travel expenses within county.
(a) The Administrative Officer of the Courts, after consultation with the chief district
judge and pursuant to the following provisions, shall set an annual salary for each magistrate:
(1) A full-time magistrate shall be paid the annual salary indicated in the table set
out in this subdivision. A full-time magistrate is a magistrate who is assigned
to work an average of not less than 40 hours a week during the term of office.
The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall designate whether a magistrate
is full-time. Initial appointment shall be at the entry rate. A magistrate's salary
shall increase to the next step every two years on the anniversary of the date
the magistrate was originally appointed for increases to Steps 1 through 3, and
every four years on the anniversary of the date the magistrate was originally
appointed for increases to Steps 4 through 6:
Table of Salaries of Full-Time Magistrates
Step Level Annual Salary
Entry Rate $47,228
Step 1 $50,714
Step 2 $54,475
Step 3 $58,457
Step 4 $63,228
Step 5 $68,973
Step 6 $75,415.
Entry Rate $56,674
Step 1 $60,857
Step 2 $65,370
Step 3 $70,148
Step 4 $75,874
*H511-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Step 5 $82,768
Step 6 $90,498.
…."
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 511-First Edition